Massachusetts, session 194th, S1419.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 9A of Chapter 111E as appearing in the 2022 edition is hereby
amended by inserting in the first sentence of the second paragraph after "immediately obtaining
appropriate emergency medical treatment" the following:- "provided such custody shall continue
in force and effect for the duration of necessary transport, screening, and evaluation for
treatment".
SECTION 2. Section 9A of Chapter 111E as appearing in the 2022 edition is hereby
amended by inserting at the end of the third paragraph after the word "treatment" the following:-
"and evaluation".
of 1